Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 45, chapter 64, Oregon Laws 2012, as amended  by section 10, chapter 386,
Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 45.  The amendments  to ORS 603.025, [ 616.706,] 619.031, 621.072, 621.166, 625.180, 628.240,
632.720 and 635.030 by sections 36  and 38  to  44, chapter 64, Oregon Laws 2012, become operative
July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.  ORS 616.706, as amended by section  37, chapter 64, Oregon Laws 2012, and section
2, chapter 386, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
616.706. (1) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 616.695 to 616.755, a person may not  operate
a food establishment without first obtaining  and thereafter maintaining a license under this section.
A person shall make an application for a license to the State Department  of Agriculture on forms
prescribed by the department. Each license  shall expire on June 30 next following the date of issu-
ance or on such date as may be specified by department rule.
(2) The department may,  subject to the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, suspend, re-
voke or refuse to issue a license if  the licensee has violated any of the provisions of ORS 616.695
to 616.755 or rules adopted under ORS 616.695 to 616.755.
(3) A license is personal to the applicant  and may not be transferred. A new license is necessary
if the business  entity of the licensee is changed, or if the membership of a partnership is changed,
irrespective of whether or not the business name is changed.
(4) The license shall cover all operations of the person licensed,  under one entity or ownership.
With prior approval of the department, the  location of a licensed food establishment, or any part
of a licensed food establishment, may  be moved without the requirement of a new license if there
is no change in the ownership or business entity.
(5) The license shall be posted in  a conspicuous place in the main office of the food establish-
ment. Duplicate copies of the license  shall be conspicuously posted in branch offices, warehouses
and other places owned  or operated by the licensee at locations other than the main office. A li-
cense is automatically canceled if the food establishment ceases or discontinues operations  or busi-
ness.
(6) The department may adopt rules establishing license fee schedules for a food establishment:
(a) That is part of a domestic kitchen;
(b) That is a retail food store;
Enrolled House Bill 2805 (HB 2805-INTRO) Page 1
(c) That is a warehouse; or
(d) That is other than part of a domestic kitchen, retail food store or warehouse.
(7) The department may determine the license fee for a  food establishment described in sub-
section (6)(b) to (d) of this section based upon the gross sales by the applicant. In establishing the
amount of a  license fee based upon gross sales by an applicant, the department shall use the annual
gross dollar volume of sales of covered operations by  that applicant within Oregon during the prior
calendar year or, if the applicant maintains sales records on a fiscal basis, the prior fiscal year. If
the applicant applying for an original license or for  a renewal license cannot provide the annual
gross dollar volume of  sales of covered operations for a full calendar year, the department shall base
the fee on  estimated annual gross sales of covered operations by the applicant. If an applicant whose
previous  year’s  fee was determined using an estimated gross sales of covered operations figure ap-
plies for renewal of that license, the fee for the previous  license year shall be adjusted to reflect the
actual gross dollar volume of sales of covered operations by the applicant.
(8) [ The department may not adopt or enforce  a rule under this section establishing a license fee
that is higher than the license fee charged for the license year that began  July 1, 2025, for an estab-
lishment of the same type and having the same volume of gross sales. ] Except as  provided in this
subsection, the department may not adopt a rule under this section to establish a license fee
that is more than three percent higher than the license fee charged during  the preceding
year for  a food establishment of the same type and having the same volume of gross sales.
When adopting a rule establishing a  license fee, notwithstanding the three percent limit, the
department may round the fee  amount to the next higher whole dollar amount.  License fee
schedules adopted under this section may not change the amount of the  same license fee more fre-
quently than once each year.
Passed by House June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2805 (HB 2805-INTRO) Page 2